District of Columbia statutes.
34-1731.08

Delegation of authority.

The Mayor may delegate the powers established by this chapter to OCTO. In exercising this authority, OCTO may consult with such other agencies as it considers appropriate in the best interests of the District.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-210, § 9, 53 DCR 9122
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 9 of Digital Inclusion Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-467, July 25, 2006, 53 DCR 6754).